California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 complying with the levy or notice to withhold instructions and reasonable charges for overdrafts that are a direct consequence of the erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action. The charges are those paid by the taxpayer and not waived or reimbursed by the financial institution or third party. Each claimant applying for reimbursement shall file a claim with the board that shall be in a form as may be prescribed by the board. In order for the board to grant a claim, the board shall determine that both of the following conditions have been satisfied:

(1) The erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action was caused by board error.

(2) Prior to the erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action, the taxpayer responded to all
 contacts by the board and provided the board with any requested information or documentation sufficient to establish the taxpayer’s position. This provision may be waived by the board for reasonable cause.

(b) Claims pursuant to this section shall be filed within 90 days from the date the bank and third-party charges were incurred by the taxpayer. Within 30 days from the date the claim is received, the board shall respond to the claim. If the board denies the claim, the taxpayer shall be notified in writing of the reason or reasons for the denial of the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 253, Sec. 3.   (SB 442)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

30459.5.

(a) At least 30 days prior to the filing or recording of liens under Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) or Chapter 14.5 (commencing with Section 7220) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the department shall mail to the taxpayer a preliminary notice. The notice shall specify the statutory authority of the department for filing or recording the lien, indicate the earliest date on which the lien may be filed or recorded, and state the remedies available to the taxpayer to prevent the filing or recording of the lien. In the event tax liens are filed for the same liability in multiple counties, only one preliminary notice shall be sent.

(b) The preliminary notice required by this section shall not apply to
 jeopardy determinations issued under Article 4 (commencing with Section 30241) of Chapter 4.

(c) If the department determines that filing a lien was in error, it shall mail a release to the taxpayer and the entity recording the lien as soon as possible, but no later than seven days, after this determination and receipt of lien recording information. The release shall contain a statement that the lien was filed in error. In the event the erroneous lien is obstructing a lawful transaction, the department shall immediately issue a release of lien to the taxpayer and the entity recording the lien.

(d) When the department releases a lien erroneously filed, notice of that fact shall be mailed to the taxpayer and, upon the request of the taxpayer, a copy of the release shall be mailed to the major credit reporting companies in the county where the lien was filed.

(e) (1) The department may release or subordinate a lien if the department determines any of the following:

(A) Release or subordination will facilitate the collection of the tax liability.

(B) Release or subordination will be in the best interest of the state and the taxpayer.

(C) Release or subordination will be in the best interest of the state and another person that is not the taxpayer but that holds an interest with the taxpayer in the property that is subject to the lien.

(2) The amendments added to this subdivision do not constitute a change in, and are declaratory of, existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 37.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30459.6.

For the purposes of this part only, the board shall not revoke or suspend a person’s license pursuant to Section 30144 or 30148 unless the board has mailed a notice preliminary to revocation or suspension that indicates that the taxpayer will be suspended by a date certain pursuant to that section. The notice preliminary to suspension shall be mailed to the taxpayer at least 60 days before the date certain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

30459.7.

(a) If any officer or employee of the board recklessly disregards board-published procedures, a taxpayer aggrieved by that action or omission may bring an action for damages against the State of California in superior court.

(b) In any action brought under subdivision (a), upon finding of liability on the part of the State of California, the state shall be liable to the plaintiff in an amount equal to the sum of all of the following:

(1) Actual and direct monetary damages sustained by the plaintiff as a result of the actions or omissions.

(2) Reasonable litigation costs including any of the following:

(A) Reasonable court costs.

(B) Prevailing market rates for the kind or quality of services furnished in connection with any of the following:

(i) The reasonable expenses of expert witnesses in connection with the civil proceeding, except that no expert witness shall be compensated at a rate in excess of the highest rate of compensation for expert witnesses paid by the State of California.

(ii) The reasonable cost of any study, analysis, engineering report,
 test, or project that is found by the court to be necessary for the preparation of the party’s case.

(iii) Reasonable fees paid or incurred for the services of attorneys in connection with the civil proceeding, except that those fees shall not be in excess of seventy-five dollars ($75) per hour unless the court determines that an increase in the cost of living or a special factor, such as the limited availability of qualified attorneys for the proceeding, justifies a higher rate.

(c) In the awarding of damages under subdivision (b), the court shall take into consideration the negligence or omissions, if any, on the part of the plaintiff which contributed to the damages.

(d) Whenever it appears to the court that the taxpayer’s position in the proceeding brought under subdivision (a) is frivolous, the court may impose
 a penalty against the plaintiff in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000). A penalty so imposed shall be paid upon a notice and demand from the board and shall be collected as a tax imposed under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

30459.8.

The board shall, in each calendar quarter, post on its Web site the amounts of cigarette and tobacco products revenues collected and disbursed for the previous calendar quarter to the General Fund, Breast Cancer Fund, the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund, and the California Children and Families Trust Fund Account.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 634, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Disposition of Proceeds [30461. - 30462.1.]

30461.

(a) All amounts required to be paid to the state under this part shall be paid to the board in the form of remittances payable to the State Board of Equalization. Except as provided in subdivision (b) and Section 30461.6, the board shall transmit the payments to the Treasurer to be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Cigarette Tax Fund, which fund is hereby created.

(b) The board shall transmit amounts received from the penalty assessed pursuant to Section
 30474 to the Treasurer for deposit in the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 903, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

30461.6.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 30461, the board shall transmit the revenue derived from the increase in the cigarette tax rate of one mill ($0.001) per cigarette imposed by Section 30101 on and after January 1, 1994, to the Treasurer to be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Breast Cancer Fund, which fund is hereby created. The Breast Cancer Fund shall consist of two accounts: the Breast Cancer Research Account and the Breast Cancer Control Account. The revenues deposited in the fund shall be divided equally between the two accounts.

(b) The moneys in the accounts within the Breast Cancer Fund shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be allocated as follows:

(1) The moneys in the
 Breast Cancer Research Account shall be allocated for research with respect to the cause, cure, treatment, earlier detection, and prevention of breast cancer as follows:

(A) Ten percent to the Cancer Surveillance Section of the State Department of Public Health for the collection of breast cancer-related data and the conduct of breast cancer-related epidemiological research by the state cancer registry established pursuant to Section 103885 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Ninety percent to the Breast Cancer Research Program, that is hereby created at the University of California, for the awarding of grants and contracts to researchers for research with respect to the
 cause, cure, treatment, prevention, and earlier detection of breast cancer and with respect to the cultural barriers to accessing the health care system for early detection and treatment of breast cancer.

(2) The moneys in the Breast Cancer Control Account shall be allocated to the Breast Cancer Control Program, that is hereby created for the provision of early breast cancer detection services for uninsured and underinsured women. The Breast Cancer Control Program shall be established in the State Department of Health Care Services and shall be administered in coordination with the breast and cervical cancer control program established pursuant to Public Law 101-354.

(c) The early breast cancer detection services provided by the Breast Cancer Control Program shall include all of the following:

(1) Screening,
 including mammography, of women for breast cancer as an early detection health care measure.

(2) After screening, medical referral of screened women and services necessary for definitive diagnosis, including nonradiological techniques or biopsy.

(3) If a positive diagnosis is made, then assistance and advocacy shall be provided to help the person obtain necessary treatment.

(4) Outreach and health education activities to ensure that uninsured and underinsured women are aware of and appropriately utilize the services provided by the Breast Cancer Control Program.

(d) (1) Any entity funded by the Breast Cancer Control Program shall coordinate with other local providers of breast cancer screening, diagnostic, followup, education, and
 advocacy services to avoid duplication of effort. Any entity funded by the program shall comply with any applicable state and federal standards regarding mammography quality assurance.

(2) To the extent required or permitted by federal law, a provider of breast cancer screening or diagnostic services may employ digital mammography technology for the purposes of mammography screening and diagnostic procedures that are conducted prior to January 1, 2014, when film, otherwise known as analog, mammography technology is unavailable. To the extent required or permitted by federal law and notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.18 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the payment rate for all mammography screening that is conducted prior to January 1, 2014, shall be limited to the Medi-Cal payment rate for film mammography screening.

(e) Notwithstanding Section
 10231.5 of the Government Code, each year, the State Department of Health Care Services shall submit an annual report about the Breast Cancer Control Program, including information described in subdivision (f), to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature and to other appropriate entities. The department shall submit the report, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, no later than February 28 each fiscal year.

(f) Any entity funded by the Breast Cancer Control Program shall collect data and maintain records that are determined by the State Department of Health Care Services to be necessary to facilitate the department’s ability to monitor and evaluate the effectiveness of the program entities and the program. The costs associated with the report described in subdivision (e) shall be paid from the allocation made pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). The report shall describe the activities and
 effectiveness of the program and shall include, but not be limited to, the following types of information:

(1) The number of recipients served.

(2) The ethnic, geographic, and age breakdown.

(3) The breast and cervical cancer stages of presentation.

(4) The breast and cervical cancer diagnostic and treatment status.

(5) Program caseload.

(6) Estimated clinical claims and expenditures.

(7) Program activities and monitoring data.

(8) A breakdown of expenditures for clinical service activities,
 including, but not limited to, office visits and consults, screening mammograms, diagnostic mammograms, diagnostic breast procedures, case management, and other clinical services.

(g) The Breast Cancer Control Program shall be conducted in consultation with the Breast Cancer Research Program created pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(h) In implementing the Breast Cancer Control Program, the State Department of Health Care Services may appoint and consult with an advisory panel appointed by the Director of Health Care Services and consisting of one ex officio, nonvoting member from the Breast Cancer Research Program, breast cancer researchers, and representatives from voluntary, nonprofit health organizations, health care professional organizations, breast cancer survivor groups, and breast cancer and health care-related advocacy groups. It is the
 intent of the Legislature that breast cancer-related survivors and advocates and health advocates for low-income women compose at least one-third of the advisory panel. It is also the intent of the Legislature that the State Department of Health Care Services collaborate closely with the panel.

(i) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting the Breast Cancer Control Program to decrease cancer mortality rates attributable to breast cancer among uninsured and underinsured women, with special emphasis on low-income, Native American, and minority women. It is also the intent of the Legislature that the communities served by the Breast Cancer Control Program reflect the ethnic, racial, cultural, and geographic diversity of the state and that the Breast Cancer Control Program fund entities where uninsured and underinsured women are most likely to seek their health care.

(j) The
 State Department of Health Care Services or any entity funded by the Breast Cancer Control Program shall collect personal and medical information necessary to administer this program from any individual applying for services under the program. The information shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed other than for purposes directly connected with the administration of this program or except as otherwise provided by law or pursuant to prior written consent of the subject of the information.

The State Department of Health Care Services or any entity funded by the Breast Cancer Control Program may disclose the confidential information to medical personnel and fiscal intermediaries of the state to the extent necessary to administer this program, and to other state public health agencies or medical researchers when the confidential information is necessary to carry out the duties of those agencies or researchers in the investigation, control, or surveillance of
 breast cancer.

(k) The State Department of Health Care Services shall adopt regulations to implement this act in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The initial adoption of implementing regulations shall be deemed an emergency and shall be considered as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare, within the meaning of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code. Emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days.

(l) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section that this section supersede and be operative in place of Section 30461.6 of the Revenue and Taxation Code as added by Chapter 660 of the Statutes of 1993.

(m) To implement the Breast Cancer Control Program, the State Department of Health Care Services may contract, to the extent permitted by Section 19130 of the Government Code, with public and private entities, or utilize existing health care service provider enrollment and payment mechanisms, including the Medi-Cal program’s fiscal intermediary. However, the Medi-Cal program’s fiscal intermediary shall only be utilized if services provided under the program are specifically identified and reimbursed in a manner that does not claim federal financial reimbursement. Any contracts with, and the utilization of, the Medi-Cal program’s fiscal intermediary shall not be subject to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12100) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. Contracts to implement the Breast Cancer Control Program entered into by the State Department of Health Care Services with entities other than the Medi-Cal program’s fiscal intermediary
 shall not be subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 62.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

30462.

(a) All money deposited in the Cigarette Tax Fund under this part is hereby appropriated, subject to the provisions of any budget bill heretofore or hereafter enacted, and shall, upon order of the Controller, be drawn therefrom and allocated for the following purposes:

(1) To pay the refunds authorized by this part.

(2) The balance remaining in the fund shall be transferred to the General Fund of this state on
 or before the last calendar day of each month.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that Section 30111 continues to prohibit the imposition of local taxes by any city, charter city, town, county, charter county, city and county, charter cities and counties, or other political subdivision or agency of this state, on the sale, use, ownership, holding, or other distribution of cigarettes and tobacco products except as provided by Section 30111. The Legislature finds and declares that the need for uniform statewide regulation and collection of cigarette taxes is a matter of statewide concern, and it is the Legislature’s intent to regulate the subject matter of cigarette taxes comprehensively and to occupy the field to the exclusion of local action except as specifically provided by Section 30111.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 227, Sec. 99.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30462.1.

Any city may apply to the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance to estimate its population. The department may make the estimate if in the opinion of the department there is available adequate information upon which to base the estimate. Not less than 25 days nor more than 30 days after the completion of the estimate, the Department of Finance shall file a certified copy thereof with the Controller if the estimate is
 greater than the current certified population. This certification may be made once each fiscal year.

All payments under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 30462 for any allocation subsequent to the filing of the estimate shall be based upon the population so estimated until a subsequent certification is made by the Department of Finance or a subsequent federal decennial census is made.

Population changes based on a federal or state special census or estimate validated by the Department of Finance shall be accepted by the Controller only if certified to them at the request of the Department of Finance. The request shall be made only if the census or estimate is greater than the current certified population and shall become effective on the first day of the month following receipt of the certification.

The Department of Finance may assess a reasonable
 charge, not to exceed the actual cost thereof, for the preparation of population estimates pursuant to this section, which is a proper charge against the city applying therefor. The amount received shall be deposited in the State Treasury as a reimbursement to be credited to the appropriation from which the expenditure is made.

As of May 1, 1988, any population estimate prepared by the Department of Finance pursuant to Section 2227 may be used for all purposes of this section unless a written request not to certify is received by the department from the city within 25 days of completion of the estimate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 138.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Violations [30471. - 30483.]

30471.

Any person who fails or refuses to file any report required to be made, or who fails or refuses to furnish a supplemental report or other data required by the board, or who fails or refuses to allow an inspection by the board, pursuant to Section 30435, or who renders a false or fraudulent report is guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30472.

Any person required to make, render, sign, or verify any report who makes any false or fraudulent report with intent to defeat or evade the determination required by law to be made is guilty of a misdemeanor. He shall for each offense be fined not less than three hundred dollars ($300) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or be imprisoned for not exceeding one year in the county jail, or be subject to both fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30473.

Any person who falsely or fraudulently makes, forges, alters, reuses or counterfeits any stamp or meter impression provided for or authorized under this part, or tampers with any metering machine authorized under this part, or causes or procures to be falsely or fraudulently made, forged, altered, reused, or counterfeited, any such stamp or meter impression or knowingly and willfully utters, publishes, passes, or tenders as genuine any such false, forged, altered, reused, or counterfeited stamp or meter impression, for the purpose of evading the tax imposed by
 this part, is guilty of a felony and subject to imprisonment for two, three, or four years, or to a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or to both fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 501, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

30473.5.

(a) Any person who possesses, sells, or offers to sell, or buys or offers to buy, any false, fraudulent, or unaffixed stamps or meter impressions provided for or authorized under this part in a quantity of less than 2,000 is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment not exceeding one year in a county jail, or by both the fine and
 imprisonment.

(b) Any person who possesses, sells, or offers to sell, or buys or offers to buy, any false, fraudulent, or unaffixed stamps or meter impressions provided for or authorized under this part in a quantity of 2,000 or greater, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisonment not exceeding one year in a county jail, or by both the fine and imprisonment. The court shall order any fines assessed be deposited in the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Compliance Fund.

(c) For purposes of this section, “unaffixed stamps” means stamps for which the tax has previously been paid by a licensed distributor and previously affixed to a package. “Unaffixed stamps” do not include any unused and unapplied rolls of stamps or loose stamps acquired from the board or its authorized agent and in the possession of a licensed
 distributor.

(d) The board shall destroy any stamps seized under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 662, Sec. 2.   (AB 1901)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

30474.

(a) Any person who knowingly possesses, or keeps, stores, or retains for the purpose of sale, or sells or offers to sell, any package of cigarettes to which there is not affixed the stamp or meter impression required to be affixed under this part, when those cigarettes have been obtained from any source whatever, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall for each offense be fined an amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or be imprisoned for a
 period not to exceed one year in the county jail, or, at the discretion of the court, be subject to both fine and imprisonment in the county jail.

(b) In addition to the fine or sentence, or both, each person convicted under this section shall pay one hundred dollars ($100) for each carton of 200 cigarettes, or portion thereof, if that person knowingly possessed, or kept, stored, or retained for the purpose of sale, or sold or offered for sale in violation of this section, as determined by the court. The court shall direct that 50 percent of the penalty assessed be transmitted to the local prosecuting jurisdiction, to be allocated for costs of prosecution, and 50 percent of the penalty assessed be transmitted to the board. The board may collect the penalty due pursuant to this section in the manner prescribed in Section 30483.

(c) This section shall not apply to a licensed
 distributor that possesses, keeps, stores, or retains cigarettes before the necessary stamp or meter impression is affixed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 727, Sec. 18.   (AB 242)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

30474.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the sale or possession for sale of counterfeit tobacco products, or the sale or possession for sale of counterfeit cigarettes by a manufacturer, importer, distributor, wholesaler, or retailer shall result in the seizure of the product by the board or any law enforcement agency and shall constitute a misdemeanor punishable as follows:

(1) A violation with a total quantity of less than two cartons of cigarettes shall be a
 misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisonment not to exceed one year in a county jail, or both fine and imprisonment, and shall also result in the revocation by the board of the manufacturer, distributor, or wholesale license.

(2) A violation with a quantity of two cartons of cigarettes or more shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisonment not to exceed one year in a county jail, or both fine and imprisonment, and shall also result in the revocation by the board of the manufacturer, distributor, or wholesaler license.

(b) A court shall consider a defendant’s ability to pay when imposing fines pursuant to this section.

(c) For the purposes of this section, counterfeit cigarette and tobacco products include
 cigarette and tobacco products that have false manufacturing labels, false or fraudulent stamps or meter impressions, or a combination thereof.

(d) The board shall seize and destroy any cigarettes or other tobacco products forfeited to the state under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 501, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

30474.5.

(a) This section shall be known as and may be cited as the Black Market Cigarette and Street Corruption Prevention Act.

(b) The Legislature finds that the sale of black-market, untaxed cigarettes has resulted in the loss of hundreds of millions of dollars in revenue to the state, robbing state health care and programs designed to help
 children.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature, by enacting the act adding this section, to provide resources to prosecutors and local law enforcement personnel, and to enable local jurisdictions to develop a multiagency task force for the purpose of significantly reducing the sales of black-market cigarettes and creating a deterrent to those sales through the focused investigation and prosecution of sales of black-market cigarettes, and other associated offenses and related crimes.

(d) In addition to the fine or sentence, or both, imposed by Section 30474, each person convicted under Section 30474 shall pay one hundred dollars ($100) for each carton of 200 cigarettes, or portion thereof, knowingly possessed, or kept, stored, or retained for the purpose of sale, or sold or offered for sale in violation of Section 30474, as determined by the court. The court shall direct that
 the penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) assessed under this section shall be transmitted to the Controller for deposit in the Unlawful Sales Reduction Fund, which is hereby created. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the moneys in the fund shall be allocated to the Office of Criminal Justice Planning for the funding of a competitive grant program to be established by the Legislature to award grants to local jurisdictions for the purpose of establishing a multiagency task force, the composition of which shall include prosecutors and local law enforcement personnel and may include state law enforcement personnel, for the purpose of significantly reducing the sales of black-market cigarettes, and creating a deterrent to those sales through the focused investigation and prosecution of sales of black-market cigarettes and other associated offenses and related crimes. No more than 5 percent of the amount transmitted from the penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) assessed under this section may be retained to
 fund the costs of administering the competitive grant program.

(e) The Office of Criminal Justice Planning shall consult with the State Board of Equalization in the administration of the competitive grant program.

(f) (1) The one hundred dollar ($100) penalty for each carton of 200 cigarettes knowingly possessed, or kept, stored, or retained for the purpose of sale, or sold, or offered for sale in violation of Section 30474, as authorized under subdivision (d), shall only be imposed for the period beginning on January 1, 2003, and ending on January 1, 2006.

(2) This section shall remain in effect until December 1, 2006, or until all the moneys remaining in the Unlawful Sales Reduction Fund on January 1, 2006, have been appropriated by the Legislature for allocation to the Office of Criminal
 Justice Planning for funding the competitive grant program established under this section, whichever occurs later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 687, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Inoperative on or after December 1, 2006, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

30475.

(a) Any transporter who transports cigarettes or tobacco products upon the highways, roads or streets of this state without having obtained a permit or without having a permit in the transporting vehicle as prescribed by Section 30431 or without having in the transporting vehicle the invoices, bills of lading or delivery tickets for the cigarettes or tobacco products as prescribed by Section 30432 is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned for not more
 than one year in the county jail, or be subject to both fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court.

(b) Any transporter who, with intent to defeat or evade or with intent to aid another to defeat or evade the taxes imposed by this part, at any given time transports 40,000 or more cigarettes or tobacco products with a value of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more upon the highways, roads or streets of this state without having obtained a permit or without having a permit in the transporting vehicle as prescribed by Section 30431 or without having in the transporting vehicle the invoices, bills of lading or delivery tickets for the cigarettes or tobacco products as prescribed by Section 30432 shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or in the state prison, or by fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or be subject to both fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the
 court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 501, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

30476.

Any person in possession or control of, or having access to, a cigarette vending machine who knowingly or willfully places for sale in the vending machine, any cigarettes not contained in packages to which are affixed California tax stamps or meter impressions, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned for not more than one year in the county jail, or be subject to both fine and imprisonment at the discretion of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 963.)
-------------------------------------------

30477.

Any violation of the provisions of this part, except as otherwise provided, is a misdemeanor and is punishable as such.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 30476 by Stats. 1967, Ch. 963.)
-------------------------------------------

30478.

It shall be a misdemeanor for any retailer, as defined in Section 6015, to knowingly purchase cigarettes or tobacco products for resale from any person except a distributor or wholesaler licensed pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 42.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

30479.

If any retailer, as defined in Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of this division, is convicted under any provision of this part and has any previous conviction within a 10-year period under this part, the State Board of Equalization shall revoke all permits issued to such person under the Sales and Use Tax Law for a period of one year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1187.)
-------------------------------------------

30480.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, any person who violates this part with intent to defeat or evade the determination of an amount due required by law to be made is guilty of a felony when the amount of tax liability aggregates twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more in any 12-consecutive-month period. The determination shall be approved by the executive director or his or her designee. Each offense shall be punished by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or
 imprisonment for 16 months, two years, or three years, or by both the fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

30481.

Any prosecution for violation of any of the penal provisions of this part shall be instituted within six years after commission of the offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30482.

Any person convicted of a crime under this part may be charged the costs of investigation and prosecution at the discretion of the court.

All moneys remitted to the board under this part shall be transmitted to the Treasurer who shall deposit it into the State Treasury and credit it to the Cigarette Tax Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30483.

(a) (1) Restitution orders or any other amounts imposed by a court of competent jurisdiction for criminal offenses upon a person or any other entity that are due and payable to the board may be collected by the board in any manner provided by law for collection of a delinquent cigarette and tobacco products tax liability, including, but not limited to, issuance of an order and levy under Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter
 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure in the manner provided for earnings withholding orders for taxes.

(2) Amounts imposed by a court of competent jurisdiction as an order of restitution for criminal offenses shall be treated as final and due and payable to the State of California on the date that amount is established on the records of the board.

(b) This part shall apply to amounts collected under this section in the same manner and with the same force and effect and to the full extent as if the language of those laws had been incorporated in full into this section, except to the extent that any provision is either inconsistent with this section or is not relevant to this section.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 30361), a refund or credit shall not be allowed
 for any amounts paid or payments applied under this section.

(d) Amounts authorized to be collected pursuant to this section may accrue interest at the greater of the rate applicable to the amounts being collected or the rate provided under Section 6591.5 from and after the date the amounts are established on the records of the board.

(e) Amounts authorized to be collected pursuant to this section shall not be subject to any statute of limitations set forth in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 30301).

(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, any portion of the amounts authorized to be collected under this section that remain unsatisfied may be collected by the recording of a notice of state tax lien. The board may record or extend a recorded
 notice of state tax lien at any time until the amount due, including any accrued interest, is paid in full.

(g) This section shall apply on and after January 1, 2012, to amounts authorized to be collected pursuant to this section that are due and payable to the board before, on, or after January 1, 2012.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 727, Sec. 19.   (AB 242)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 13.6 Healthy Outcomes and Prevention Education (HOPE) Act [31000. - 31008.]

31000.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the “Healthy Outcomes and Prevention Education (HOPE) Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 489, Sec. 3.   (SB 395)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

31001.

For purposes of this article:

(a) “California Electronic Cigarette Excise Tax” means the tax imposed by Section 31002.

(b) “Department” means the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(c) (1) Electronic cigarette” means any of the following:
